Wisconsin, session 2025, SB917.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Office of the Director of State Courts and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.SB917,11Section 1. 767.235 (1) (b) 4. L. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin 2Act 40, is amended to read:SB917,2,83767.235 (1) (b) 4. L. The affidavit states whether the parties were involved in 4any pending or completed court cases in any jurisdiction where interspousal battery 5or domestic abuse, as defined in s. 813.122 (1) (a) 813.12 (1) (am), are indicated, 6including petitions under s. 813.12, 813.122, or 813.125, or criminal cases alleging 7conduct under s. 940.60 or 940.61 (1) or s. 940.19, 2023 stats., or s. 940.20 (1m), 82023 stats., or their substantial equivalents in state, tribal, or federal court.Note: Section 1 modifies a provision created in 2025 Wisconsin Act 40 to insert the correct cross-reference to the definition of “domestic abuse” and correct cross-references to statutes that were recodified by 2025 Wisconsin Act 24.SB917,2,99